Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 20

Tennessee Collection Service Act

62-20-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Collection Service Act.”

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 1.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Attorney General Opinions. Constables as collections agents, OAG 97-043, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (4/7/97).

Application of licensure requirements, OAG 97-131, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 164 (9/23/97).

Application of collection service licensure requirements to purchasers of judgments, OAG 99-224, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 232 (12/1/99).

62-20-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the Tennessee collection service board;

“Client” means any person who retains the services of a collection service and for such services directly provides the fee, commission or other compensation;

“Collection service” means any person that engages in, or attempts to engage in, the collection of delinquent accounts, bills or other forms of indebtedness irrespective of whether the person engaging in or attempting to engage in collection activity has received the indebtedness by assignment or whether the indebtedness was purchased by the person engaging in, or attempting to engage in, the collection activity. “Collection service” does not include any person that engages in, or attempts to engage in, the collection of notes or guarantees. “Collection service” includes, but is not limited to:

Any deputy sheriff, constable or other individual who, in the course of that person's duties, accepts any compensation other than that fixed by statute in connection with the collection of an account;

Any person who, in the process of collecting that person's own accounts, uses or causes to be used any fictitious name that would indicate to a debtor that a third party is handling the accounts;

Any person who offers for sale, gives away or uses any letter or form designed for use in the collection of accounts that deceives the receiver into believing that an account is in the hands of a third party, even though the letter or form may instruct the debtor to pay directly to the debtor's creditor; and

Any person who engages in the solicitation of claims or judgments for the purpose of collecting or attempting to collect claims or judgments or who solicits the purchase of claims or judgments for the purpose of collecting or attempting to collect claims or judgments by engaging in or attempting to engage in collection activity relative to claims or judgments;

“Collection service license” means a license granted to a collection service;

“Financially responsible” means capable, as demonstrated to the board's satisfaction, of sound financial management and fiscal discretion. The board may deem to be not financially responsible any person who:

Submits a balance sheet reflecting liabilities in excess of assets;

Is unable to pay debts as they mature;

Submits materially inaccurate financial information; or

Issues a check to a client without sufficient funds for the payment of the check in full;

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, association or other legal entity; and

“Solicitor” means any individual who is employed by or under contract with a collection service to solicit accounts or sell collection service forms or systems on its behalf.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 2; modified; Acts 1988, ch. 823, §§ 1-5; 2009, ch. 279, § 6; 2013, ch. 180, § 6; 2014, ch. 996, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 996, § 5 provided that it is the legislative intent that the provisions contained in the act are remedial in nature and are intended to clarify the statute and policies of the collection services board. The clarifying provisions in the act are intended to provide a restatement of the statute and policies as the statute existed prior to May 22, 2014.

Attorney General Opinions. A company that is owned and operated by licensed attorneys that obtains assignments of judgments for a fee from judgment creditors and that divides net proceeds collected on the judgments with the judgment creditors operates as a “collection service” within the meaning of the statute, OAG 00-105, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (6/8/00).

The term “notes” in T.C.A. § 62-20-102(3), which exempts from the definition of “collection service” any person that engages in the “collection of notes or guarantees,” is best understood as encompassing only written promissory notes, i.e., unconditional written promises, signed by the maker, to pay absolutely and in any event a certain sum of money either to, or to the order of, the bearer or a designated person. When the Collection Services Board receives a complaint against a collection service licensee, it should inquire as to the nature of the underlying debt to make sure that is covered by the Tennessee Collection Services Act. OAG 19-17, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (9/25/2019).

62-20-103. Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

Any person handling claims, accounts or collections under order of any court;

Attorneys at law;

Any person engaged in the collection of indebtedness incurred in the normal course of business or the business of a parent, subsidiary or affiliated firm or corporation; however, no person who is or represents the person to be a collection service is exempt from this chapter;

Any state or national bank; state or federal mutual savings bank; state or federal savings institution; or any parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of any of the foregoing;

Any state or federal credit union;

Any industrial loan and thrift company licensed or authorized by title 45, chapter 5;

Any small business development corporation authorized by title 45, chapter 8;

Any person that services or collects obligations secured by a consensual lien on a dwelling as defined by 12 C.F.R. 1026.2(a)(19) or any successor regulation; or

Any person that holds or acquires accounts, bills or other forms of indebtedness through purchase, assignment, or otherwise; and only engages in collection activity through the use of a licensed collection agency or an attorney authorized to practice law in this state.

Nothing contained within this chapter shall be construed to require an individual or business entity that collects only the individual's or its own unpaid accounts to submit to licensure or regulation by the collection service board.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, §§ 3, 27; T.C.A., § 62-20-123; Acts 2014, ch. 996, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 996, § 5 provided that it is the legislative intent that the provisions contained in the act are remedial in nature and are intended to clarify the statute and policies of the collection services board. The clarifying provisions in the act are intended to provide a restatement of the statute and policies as the statute existed prior to May 22, 2014.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of collection services board regulation of attorneys, OAG 98-079, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (4/6/98).

Application of collection service licensure requirements to purchasers of judgments, OAG 99-224, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 232 (12/1/99).

The attorney exemption to the requirements of the Collection Service Act is only applicable to those attorneys who seek to collect the debts owing to their clients who have retained them for their services as attorneys, OAG 00-105, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (6/8/00).

The attorney exemption to the requirements of the Collection Service Act is only applicable to those attorneys who seek to collect the debts owing to their clients who have retained them for their services as attorneys; thus, attorneys who own or work for a collection service agency have a distinct identity from that of the agency and their mere connection to the agency does not relieve that agency of the requirements specified in the Collection Service Act, OAG 00-105, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (6/8/00).

The regulatory and rule-making authority granted to the Tennessee Collection Service Board does not allow it to limit the scope of the attorney exemption in T.C.A. § 62-20-103(a)(2) to only attorneys licensed to practice law in Tennessee. OAG 15-03, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/7/15).

62-20-104. Collection service board.

There is created the Tennessee collection service board, which shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor. Members shall serve for a period of three (3) years, except that appointments made to fill unexpired terms shall be for the period of the unexpired terms.

Members of this board shall be residents of this state for at least five (5) years prior to their appointment. At least two (2), but no more than three (3), of the members shall be engaged in the collection service industry. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The board may hold meetings that it may deem necessary for the purpose of transacting any business authorized under this chapter. All members of the board shall be duly notified of the time and place of each meeting. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum at any such meeting.

Each member of the board shall receive the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each meeting of the board attended by the member. Each board member shall also be reimbursed for actual travel and other expenses incurred by the member in attending each meeting of the board and in performing any other duties provided for in this chapter. All reimbursement for expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall annually select from its members a chair, vice chair and secretary. No member of the board shall hold more than one (1) such office.

All questions, submissions or requests directed to the board shall be addressed to the board's office in Nashville.

The board shall promulgate rules relating to the general conduct of collection service business that are consistent with recognized business practice and this chapter.

The director of the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance or the director's designee shall serve as executive director of the board and shall perform all administrative functions for the board. The executive director of the board shall keep an accurate record of its proceedings and transactions.

Members of the board, while acting in good faith, shall not be subject to civil liability relative to the performance of duties delegated to the board by this chapter.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 4; 1987, ch. 292, §§ 3, 4; 1988, ch. 1013, § 35.

Compiler's Notes. The collection service board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-245.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance, see §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

62-20-105. License requirement.

No person shall commence, conduct or operate any collection service business in this state unless the person holds a valid collection service license issued by the board under this chapter or prior state law.

Regular employees of licensed collection services need not procure a separate collection service license.

A licensed collection service maintaining more than one (1) place of business within the state shall register each place of business with reference to its specific location, name and purpose upon application for license and upon subsequent renewals of the license. The fees for each location for registration and renewal shall be established by the board.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair or impede the obligation of any contract, delinquent account, bills or other forms of indebtedness, nor prevent or deny any person the right to purchase, sell, assign, or take by assignment any obligation.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), no debt or obligation that has been collected by a voluntary payment or by a final judgment of any court may be set aside or challenged based on the lack of a license.

Any person who is alleged to have violated subsection (a) in the collection of a delinquent account, bill or other form of indebtedness:

May cure the default at any time, even after collection may have started, by filing an application for a license with the collection services board as provided in this chapter, and the board may not use a prior collection effort in violation of this section or § 62-20-124 as a basis or consideration for the denial of a license; and

May be subject to sanction by the collection service board, but may not be subject to other civil action or defense based on such alleged violation.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 5; 1988, ch. 823, § 6; 1990, ch. 1026, § 10; 2014, ch. 996, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 996, § 5 provided that it is the legislative intent that the provisions contained in the act are remedial in nature and are intended to clarify the statute and policies of the collection services board. The clarifying provisions in the act are intended to provide a restatement of the statute and policies as the statute existed prior to May 22, 2014.

62-20-106. Application for license.

An application for a collection service license shall be submitted on the form prescribed by the board and shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable application fee as set by the board;

A current personal or corporate financial statement prepared by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant;

A surety bond executed by the applicant and a surety company authorized to do business in this state, made payable to the state of Tennessee. The amount of this surety bond shall be pro rated and based on the certified number of employees per collection agency as follows:

One to four (1-4) employees — fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);

Five to nine (5-9) employees — twenty thousand dollars ($20,000);

Ten (10) or more employees — twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); or

Instead of the bond, a certificate of deposit in the sums as outlined in this subdivision (3)(A), which shall be assigned to the board;

The bond or assignment of certificate of deposit shall be conditioned that the applicant shall faithfully and truly perform all agreements entered into with its clients accounting for the net proceeds of all collections in accordance with this chapter; and

Any other relevant information and documentation that may be requested by the board to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for initial licensure as set forth in § 62-20-107.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 6; 1988, ch. 823, § 7; 1989, ch. 523, § 166; 1990, ch. 1026, § 9; 2015, ch. 291, § 9.

62-20-107. Qualifications of applicant.

No license to conduct or operate a collection service business in this state shall be issued to any person:

Who is not trustworthy;

Who does not have a proven reputation for honesty and fair dealings;

Who is not financially responsible;

Who, in the opinion of the board, is not competent to engage in the collection of the accounts and claims of others;

Who, within the past seven (7) years, has been convicted in any court of fraud or any felony or had judgment entered against the person in any court for failure to account to a client for money or property collected;

Whose license to practice law has been suspended or revoked within the past seven (7) years;

Who, unless a nonresident applicant, does not maintain in this state a regular office in which are kept complete records of collections and claims handled for clients and against debtors residing in this state;

Who, unless a nonresident applicant, does not maintain in this state bank accounts with sufficient funds at all times to disburse amounts due clients; and

Who, within the past seven (7) years, has filed a petition under the federal bankruptcy laws or state insolvency laws or has had a receiver, fiscal agent or similar officer appointed by a court for the person's business or property.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 7; 1988, ch. 823, § 8.

62-20-108. Notice to board.

The board shall be promptly notified in writing of any change in address, management or ownership of a collection service business.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 8; 1987, ch. 292, § 2; 1988, ch. 823, §§ 10-16; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 167, 168; 2001, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 279, § 7; 2013, ch. 180, § 7.

62-20-109. License fee and display.

The board shall grant a collection service license to a qualified applicant upon receipt of a fee as set by the board. The fee shall not be prorated for any portion of a year.

The collection service license shall be prominently displayed at all times at the licensee's place of business.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 9; 1985, ch. 354, § 13; 1987, ch. 292, § 5; 1988, ch. 823, § 17; 1989, ch. 523, § 169.

Cross-References. License renewal, § 62-20-112.

62-20-110. Bond posted or certificate of deposit assigned.

The bond posted or the certificate of deposit assigned in accordance with this chapter shall be in full force and effect during all periods and in all places and areas in which the licensee is doing business within this state as a collection service.

If any collection service violates the conditions of the bond or certificate of deposit, the injured client may maintain an action in the client's own name on the bond or certificate of deposit of the collection service in any court of competent jurisdiction.

In no event shall the aggregate liability of the surety exceed the amount of the bond, nor shall the board or this state be liable to any client relative to an assigned certificate of deposit.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 10.

62-20-111. Solicitors' identification cards.

No person may act as a solicitor for any collection service unless the person possesses a valid solicitor's identification card issued by the board to the collection service.

Identification cards shall be obtainable by written application of the collection service licensee, accompanied by an annual fee as set by the board.

The identification cards shall be the property of and in the name of the collection service licensee, who may transfer them from one (1) of the collection service licensee's solicitors to another.

The collection service licensee shall be responsible for the proper training and conduct of each solicitor acting in the collection service licensee's behalf.

In order to protect the rights of creditors, all letters of collection or notices of collection from a collection agency to a debtor shall contain language stating that the collection agency is licensed by the collection service board of the department of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 11; 1985, ch. 354, § 14; 1988, ch. 823, § 18; 1989, ch. 523, § 170; 1992, ch. 580, § 3; 2001, ch. 130, § 2.

62-20-112. Expiration and renewal of licenses.

All licenses or identification cards shall expire the last day of the twenty-fourth month from issuance or renewal.

Application for renewal of a collection service license shall be submitted to the board prior to the expiration date and shall be accompanied by:

A fee as set by the board;

Evidence of renewal of the bond or certificate of deposit under the terms required by this chapter;

A current balance sheet prepared by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant; and

Proof that all taxes that are applicable to the collection service licensee and that are then due and payable have been paid.

All licenses shall be subject to late renewal for a period of sixty (60) days following their expiration date by payment of the prescribed fee plus a penalty as set by the board.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 12; 1985, ch. 354, § 15; 1988, ch. 823, §§ 19-23; 1989, ch. 360, § 11; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 171-173; 1990, ch. 1026, § 43; 2008, ch. 1038, § 3; 2013, ch. 180, § 8.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules establishing renewal dates of licenses, certificates or permits, § 56-1-302.

62-20-113. Licenses nontransferable.

No license shall be transferable to another person.

Upon change of ownership of a collection service, the new owner shall apply for and obtain a new collection service license before commencing or continuing business.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 13; 1988, ch. 823, § 24.

62-20-114. Requirements of collection service licensees.

Each collection service licensee shall:

Keep and retain for a period of three (3) years accurate individual records of collections, including the amount and date of payment and the names of the debtor and creditor;

Issue, upon request, individual collection receipts, showing the amount and date of payment, names of the debtor and creditor and the balance, if any, remaining unpaid;

Maintain a separate fiduciary or trust bank account with sufficient funds at all times to disburse amounts due all clients; and

Maintain records and books reflecting the true condition of bank accounts at the end of each calendar month.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 14; 1988, ch. 823, § 26.

62-20-115. Investigations — Denial, revocation or suspension of licenses.

The board may, upon its own motion, or shall, upon the sworn complaint in writing of any person, investigate any collection service or licensee operating in the state.

The board shall transmit any such complaint within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the complaint to the accused licensee by registered or certified mail.

The licensee shall, within twenty (20) days, file with the board the licensee's sworn answer to the complaint.

The board may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew any license held under this chapter for any of the following causes:

Obtaining a license through misrepresentation or fraud;

Collecting or attempting to collect from the debtor any fee, commission or other compensation not provided by law for collection services rendered to a client, except that a collection service may recover from debtors reasonable charges imposed by banks for processing insufficient fund checks; provided, that the charges do not exceed nine dollars ($9.00) per check;

Failing to report and pay to a client the net proceeds of all collections made during a calendar month within thirty (30) days, unless otherwise provided by mutual agreement between the licensee and the client;

Violating or cooperating with others in violating any provision of this chapter or any rule lawfully promulgated by the board;

Failing to comply with any applicable state or federal law or regulation pertaining to the credit and collection industry; and

Any cause for which issuance of a license could have been refused had it existed and been known to the board at the time of issuance.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 15; 1987, ch. 292, § 1; 1988, ch. 823, §§ 27, 28; 1998, ch. 843, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-20-116. Actions required at expiration or revocation of license.

Upon the expiration or revocation of any license held under this chapter, the licensee shall:

Within ninety (90) days, return or assign all uncollected accounts to the licensee's clients or their order;

Not charge or receive any fee or compensation for the return or assignment of uncollected accounts;

Not charge or receive any fee or compensation on any moneys received or collected subsequent to the expiration, suspension or revocation; and

Within ninety (90) days, remit all moneys to the owners of the accounts on which the moneys were paid.

This section shall not be construed to:

Prohibit a bulk sale of the business, assets and good will of a collection service whose license becomes invalid; or

Deprive a licensee of the privilege of late renewal granted by § 62-20-112.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 16; 1988, ch. 823, § 29; 2013, ch. 180, § 9.

62-20-117. Reciprocity — Service of process on nonresidents — Default judgments.

A nonresident of this state who is regularly engaged in the collection business in another state may obtain a license as a collection service in this state by complying with this chapter; provided, that the nonresident applicant maintains a place of business in the other state and that state offers the same privilege to the licensees of this state.

Every nonresident applicant shall file an irrevocable consent that legal action may be commenced against the nonresident applicant in the proper court of any county of this state in which a cause of action may arise, in which the plaintiff may reside, by service of process or pleading authorized by the laws of this state, or by any member of the board, the consent stipulating that the service of process or pleading shall be taken in all courts to be valid and binding as if personal service had been made upon the nonresident licensee in this state. The consent shall be duly acknowledged and, if made by a corporation, shall be authenticated by its seal.

Any service of process or pleading shall be served on the secretary of the board by filing duplicate copies, one (1) of which shall be filed in the office of the board and the other forwarded by registered mail to the last known principal address of the nonresident licensee against whom the process or pleading is directed.

No default in any such action shall be taken, except upon affidavit certification of the board or the secretary of the board that a copy of the process or pleading was mailed to the defendant as provided in this subsection (b). No default judgment shall be taken in any such action or proceeding until thirty (30) days after the day of mailing of process or pleading to the defendant.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 17.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-20-118. User responsible for ascertaining service is licensed.

Any person who places an account with a collection service is responsible for determining that the service is licensed as required by this chapter.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 18.

62-20-119. Confidentiality of information.

Any financial information submitted by applicants for or holders of licenses pursuant to this chapter shall be treated as confidential and shall be used by the board only for the purpose of determining qualifications to engage in the collection service business.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 19.

Cross-References. Confidential records, § 10-7-504.

62-20-120. Unauthorized acts.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit:

The use or sale of forms that simulate legal forms so as to deceive a debtor or the general public;

The unauthorized practice of law; or

A collection agency to notify a credit bureau or credit agency concerning the owner of record of a motor vehicle who has failed to pay an overdue parking ticket or tickets without first notifying the owner of record of the motor vehicle that, if the ticket is not timely paid to the collection agency by a date included in the notification, the credit bureau or credit agency will be notified of such fact, which could affect the owner's credit rating.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 20; 2009, ch. 577, § 3.

62-20-121. Temporary retirement.

Any licensee may temporarily retire the licensee's license for a period of three (3) years by giving written notice of such intent and paying each year an annual retirement fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to the board.

Any license not activated within the three-year period becomes invalid.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 21.

62-20-122. Hearings and judicial review.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 22.

62-20-123. Violations.

A willful violation of this chapter or of any rule lawfully promulgated under this chapter is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, ch. 170, § 23; T.C.A., § 62-20-124; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-20-124. Conditions to assignment of accounts — Commencement of litigation — Application of payments.

A collection service, holding a valid license under this chapter, may bill, collect or file suit in its own name, as the real party in interest, on any form of indebtedness, so long as the owner or holder of the indebtedness has assigned this limited right to the collection service licensee and the following conditions have been met:

The assignment was voluntary, properly executed and acknowledged by the person making the assignment to the collection service licensee;

The original agreement between the creditor and the debtor does not prohibit an assignment for the limited purpose of billing, collecting or filing suit in the assignee's own name, as the real party in interest;

The assignment was manifested by a written agreement stating the effective date of the assignment and any consideration given for the assignment. The written agreement must also disclose that the collection service licensee may, for purposes of litigation, consolidate the assigned account, bill, note or other form of indebtedness with those of other creditors against the individual debtor or codebtors;

The assignment to the collection service licensee does not transfer title or any ownership interest in the underlying account, bill, note or other form of indebtedness to the collection service licensee; and

A collection service licensee bringing suit in its own name as an assignee may submit an affidavit of sworn account that has been executed under oath by the assigning party or by a person qualified to execute a sworn account pursuant to § 24-5-107(a). The licensee shall file a copy of the sworn account with the court for service upon the debtor.

A collection service licensee may commence litigation for the collection of an assigned account, bill, note or other indebtedness in a court of competent jurisdiction located in any of the following counties:

The county in which the debtor signed the account, bill, note or other indebtedness sued upon;

In the case of consolidated accounts that all arose from the same county, the county in which all of the consolidated accounts, bills, notes or other indebtednesses arose; or

The county in which the debtor resides at the commencement of the action.

No collection service licensee shall commence any litigation authorized by this section, unless the collection service licensee appears by an attorney admitted to practice law in this state.

For purposes of commencing litigation, a collection service licensee that has taken an assignment or assignments pursuant to this section may consolidate the assigned accounts, bills, notes or other indebtedness of one (1) or more creditors against one (1) individual debtor or codebtors, in one (1) case. Each assigned account, bill, note or indebtedness must be separately identified and pled in any consolidated action authorized by this section. The individual amount of each account, bill, note or other indebtedness that forms the basis for any consolidated action shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200) each, as identified and pled by the collection service licensee, exclusive of court costs, attorney fees and interest that may have accrued before the filing of the consolidated action. The aggregate amount of consolidated accounts, bills, notes and other indebtedness in any one (1) case shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), as identified and pled by the collection service licensee, exclusive of court costs, attorney fees and interest that may have accrued before the filing of the consolidated action. Court costs shall be assessed to the losing party. Interest, attorney fees and reimbursable expenses shall be assessed against the losing party, if provided in any of the consolidated accounts, bills, notes or other indebtedness or as otherwise permitted or required by law.

If a debtor or codebtor files a sworn denial or otherwise raises a dispute concerning any account, bill, note or other evidence of indebtedness, the court shall dismiss the account, bill, note or other evidence of indebtedness, without prejudice. The collection service licensee may bring a separate case for any such disputed account, bill, note or other evidence of indebtedness within one (1) year of dismissal; provided, however, that the disputed account, bill, note or other evidence of indebtedness cannot be consolidated with any other account, bill, note or other evidence of indebtedness.

For any account on which an affidavit of sworn account is filed pursuant to § 24-5-107(a), a separate affidavit shall be filed for each account in a consolidated action.

Nothing in this section relieves a collection service licensee from complying with the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. § 1692) or deprives any debtor of the right to assert defenses as provided in that act.

On the face of any warrant or other pleading filed in any consolidated action or in an attachment to the warrant or pleading, the collection service licensee shall state the order in which the creditor intends to apply payments received on any judgment obtained in the consolidated action. The collection service licensee shall also state that payments will be applied as stated unless the debtor instructs otherwise in writing or the court orders otherwise.

Acts 2004, ch. 674, § 1; 2014, ch. 996, § 3; T.C.A. § 62-20-127.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 62-20-127 to § 62-20-124 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 996, § 5 provided that it is the legislative intent that the provisions contained in the act are remedial in nature and are intended to clarify the statute and policies of the collection services board. The clarifying provisions in the act are intended to provide a restatement of the statute and policies as the statute existed prior to May 22, 2014.